Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-690
Aiding or abetting; guilty of such offense.

Any person who commits, attempts to commit, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of any act declared in the Nebraska Rules of the Road to be a misdemeanor or felony, whether individually or in connection with one or more other persons or as a principal, agent, or accessory, shall be guilty of such offense, and any person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly, or willfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, or directs another to violate any provision of the rules shall be likewise guilty of such offense.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 115;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,115;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 186.